Maryland, session 2026, HB0865.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–1005.
(g) (1) If an insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance
organization fails to pay a clean claim for reimbursement or otherwise violates any
provision of this section, the insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance
organization shall pay interest on the amount of the claim that remains unpaid 30 days
after receipt of the initial clean claim for reimbursement at the monthly rate of:
(i) 1.5% from the 31st day through the 60th day;
(ii) 2% from the 61st day through the 120th day; and
(iii) 2.5% after the 120th day.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0865*

HOUSE BILL 865
(2) The interest paid under this subsection shall be included in any late
reimbursement without the necessity for the person that filed the original claim to make
an additional claim for that interest.
(3) AN INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A HEALTH
MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION THAT OWES INTEREST UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL PROVIDE REMITTANCE ADVICE TO THE PERSON THAT FILED THE ORIGINAL
CLAIM THAT SEPARATELY IDENTIFIES AND ITEMIZES THE INTEREST.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.